Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2810.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of Chapter 44-68 of the General Laws entitled "Tax Preparers Act
of 2013" is hereby amended to read as follows:
CHAPTER 44-68
Tax Preparers Act of 2013
CHAPTER 44-68
TAX PREPARERS ACT
SECTION 2. Sections 44-68-2, 44-68-3 and 44-68-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-
68 entitled "Tax Preparers Act of 2013" are hereby amended to read as follows:
44-68-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, have the following meanings:
(a) “Ghost preparer” means a tax return preparer who does not self-identify on returns they
prepare or does not comply with the PTIN requirements in 26 U.S.C. § 6109 and Treasury
Regulation 26 C.F.R. § 1.6109-2, and is compensated for or otherwise benefits from the preparation
of returns.
(a)(b) “Tax return preparer” means an individual who prepares a substantial portion of any
return for compensation. Tax return preparers include ghost preparers and individuals required to
register with the Internal Revenue Service as a tax return preparer and who have a Preparer Tax
Identification Number (PTIN). For the purpose of this chapter the following individuals shall not

be considered tax return preparers:
(1) Volunteer tax return preparers; or
(2) Employees of a tax return preparer and employees of a commercial tax return
preparation business who provide only clerical, administration or other similar services.
(b)(c) “Preparer Tax Identification Number” or “PTIN” means the number issued by the
Internal Revenue Service (IRS) to paid preparers to use that must be included on all the returns
they prepare.
(c)(d) “Return” shall mean any tax report, return, claim for refund or attachment to any
report, return and/or claim for return refund filed with the tax administrator pursuant to the tax laws
of this state.
44-68-3. Duties and responsibilities.
(a) A tax return preparer who prepares any return that is submitted to the tax administrator
must comply with all state laws and all applicable regulations promulgated by the tax administrator.
(b) A tax return preparer must sign and include his/her preparer tax identification number
on all returns prepared and filed with the division of taxation.
(c) A tax return preparer shall not be a ghost preparer or engage in any activity with the
intent to facilitate the use of a ghost preparer.
44-68-4. Civil penalties.
(a) Failure to be diligent in determining eligibility for or amount of earned-income credit.
Upon a determination by the tax administrator that a tax return preparer prepared a return(s) and
failed to comply with due diligence requirements imposed by regulations issued by the tax
administrator with respect to determining eligibility for, or the amount of, the credit allowable by
§ 44-30-2.6(c)(2)(N), the tax return preparer shall pay a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for
each such return and/or claim.
(b) Failure to be diligent in determining eligibility for property tax relief credit. Upon a
determination by the tax administrator that a tax return preparer prepared a return(s) and failed to
comply with due diligence requirements imposed by regulations issued by the tax administrator
with respect to determining eligibility for, or the amount of, the property tax relief credit allowable
by § 44-33-1 et seq., the tax return preparer shall pay a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for
each such return.
(c) Tax return preparer civil penalties.
(1) Upon a determination by the tax administrator that a tax return preparer willfully
prepared, assisted in preparing, or caused the preparation of a return(s) filed with the division of
taxation with intent to wrongfully obtain a property tax relief credit or with the intent to evade or
LC004982/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

reduce a tax obligation, the tax return preparer shall be liable for a penalty of one thousand dollars
($1,000), or five hundred ($500) for each return so filed during any calendar year, whichever is
greater.
(2) Upon a determination by the tax administrator that a tax return preparer willfully misled
or committed fraud against a taxpayer, or purposefully circumvented tax laws administered by the
tax administrator, or violated any provision of § 44-68-3, the tax return preparer shall be liable for
a penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each return so filed during any calendar
year.
(d) The tax administrator may suspend or revoke the privilege of a tax return preparer to
prepare and/or file returns with the division of taxation upon a determination that the tax return
preparer has failed to comply with or violated any provision of this section, any regulations issued
by the tax administrator, or with any provision of any other laws relative to the preparation of tax
returns. Any tax return preparer receiving a notice of intent to suspend or revoke the privilege to
file tax returns with the division of taxation may request a hearing on the notice of intent to suspend
or revoke; provided that said request for a hearing must be made within thirty (30) days of such
notice to suspend or revoke. If, after hearing, the tax return preparer is aggrieved by a decision of
the tax administrator (or his or her designated hearing officer), the tax return preparer may, within
thirty (30) days after notice of the decision is sent to the tax return preparer by certified or registered
mail, directed to their last known address, petition the sixth division of the district court pursuant
to chapter 8 of title 8, setting forth the reasons why the decision is alleged to be erroneous and
praying for relief therefrom. The tax administrator may, on a periodic basis, prepare and publish a
list of tax return preparers whose privileges as a tax return preparer have been suspended or
revoked.
(e) Upon a determination by the tax administrator that a tax return preparer has committed
a violation of this section subsequent to a suspension or revocation of that tax return preparer’s
privilege to prepare and/or file returns with the division of taxation, the tax return preparer shall be
liable for a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) if suspended, or ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) if revoked, per violation.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004982/SUB A
========
LC004982/SUB A - Page 3 of 4